Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.098

Settlement—Disclosure—Conference.

(1) The settlement process must be substantially uniform for licensees governed by disciplining authorities under this chapter. The disciplinary [disciplining] authorities may also use alternative dispute resolution to resolve complaints during adjudicative proceedings.

(2) Disclosure of the identity of reviewing disciplining authority members who participate in the settlement process is available to the respondent or his or her representative upon request.

(3) The settlement conference will occur only if a settlement is not achieved through written documents. The respondent will have the opportunity to conference either by phone or in person with the reviewing disciplining authority member if the respondent chooses. The respondent may also have his or her attorney conference either by phone or in person with the reviewing disciplining authority member without the respondent being present personally.

(4) If the respondent wants to meet in person with the reviewing disciplining authority member, he or she will travel to the reviewing disciplining authority member and have such a conference with a department representative in attendance either by phone or in person.

[ 1995 c 336 s 7; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 604.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.